Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2940
Relation to federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

The Uniform Mediation Act modifies, limits, or supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. 7001 et seq., but the Uniform Mediation Act does not modify, limit, or supersede 15 U.S.C. 7001(c) or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in 15 U.S.C. 7003(b).

Laws 2003, LB 255, § 11.